Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.200

Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation registered to transact business in this state may not withdraw from this state until it delivers a statement of withdrawal to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with RCW 23.95.530.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2140; 1989 c 165 s 179.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.